Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5022.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 45-55-9 of the General Laws in Chapter 45-55 entitled "Award of
Municipal Contracts" is hereby amended to read as follows:
45-55-9. Small purchases.
Procurements, not to exceed an aggregate amount of ten thousand dollars ($10,000)
twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) for construction and five thousand dollars ($5,000) ten
thousand dollars ($10,000) for all other purchases may be made in accordance with small purchase
regulations promulgated by the municipality. These amounts shall be increased or decreased
annually hereafter at the same rate as the Boston Regional Consumer Price Index. Procurement
requirements shall not be artificially divided so as to constitute a small purchase under this section.
A municipality may further reduce the aggregate purchase amount, as provided for in this section
by ordinance.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect on December 31, 2025.
========
LC000317
========